Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0455.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1526c. (1) By not later than June 1, 2027, the department shall develop or adopt, and provide to schools, resources to support professional learning related to cultural competency. The resources to support professional learning related to cultural competency must include, but not be limited to, information on the following topics: (a) Understanding the value of diversity and improving students' sense of belonging in schools. (b) Understanding of cultural identity. (c) Key historic contributions and perspectives of Asian American and Pacific Islander, Black, Indigenous, Latine, Hispanic, Jewish American, European American, Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American people in this state and the United States. (d) Implicit bias. The training in implicit bias under this subdivision must have been developed with expert input. (2) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall require all educators to receive training in cultural competency using the resources developed or adopted under subsection (1) or using existing resources from the school district or public school academy that are comparable to the resources developed or adopted under subsection (1). The training in cultural competency may be provided as part of the professional development described in section 1527. (3) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall require all school personnel who have contact with pupils and are not educators to receive training in cultural competency using the resources developed or adopted under subsection (1) or using existing resources from the school district or public school academy that are comparable to the resources developed or adopted under subsection (1). An individual described in this subsection is not required to receive training on the topics described in subsection (1)(c). (4) The department may make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional material related to Asian American and Pacific Islander, Black, Indigenous, Latine, Hispanic, Jewish American, European American, Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American history that is in accordance with the state social studies content standards prescribed by the state board.